Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.802

Proof of surrender and receipt pattern form—Declaration of nonsurrender pattern form—Administrative office of the courts to develop.

By December 1, 2014, the administrative office of the courts shall develop a proof of surrender and receipt pattern form to be used to document that a respondent has complied with a requirement to surrender firearms, dangerous weapons, and his or her concealed pistol license, as ordered by a court under RCW 9.41.800. The administrative office of the courts must also develop a declaration of nonsurrender pattern form to document compliance when the respondent has no firearms, dangerous weapons, or concealed pistol license.

[ 2014 c 111 s 4.]